Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.185

Basis for appointment of guardian for minor.

(1) A person becomes a guardian for a minor only on appointment by the court.

(2) The court may appoint a guardian for a minor who does not have a guardian if the court finds the appointment is in the minor's best interest and:

(a) Each parent of the minor, after being fully informed of the nature and consequences of guardianship, consents;

(b) All parental rights have been terminated; or

(c) There is clear and convincing evidence that no parent of the minor is willing or able to exercise parenting functions as defined in RCW 26.09.004.

[ 2020 c 312 s 101; 2019 c 437 s 201.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.